North Dakota, session 69, HB1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, to the state treasurer for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the state
treasurer, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $1,605,584 $187,105 $1,792,689
New and vacant FTE pool 0 36,646 36,646
Operating expenses 265,346 294,258 559,604
Coal severance payments 118,000 4,000 122,000
Carbon dioxide pipeline payments 0 1 ,000,000 1,000,000
Total all funds $1,988,930 $1,522,009 $3,510,939
Total special funds 0 295,000 295,000
Total general fund $1,988,930 $1,227,009 $3,215,939
Full-time equivalent positions 7.00 0.00 7.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund Other Funds Total
Information technology projects $0 $295,000 $295,000
Total $0 $295,000 $295,000
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The state
treasurer may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in section 1 of
this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and
vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the guidelines and
reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth legislative
assembly.
SECTION 4. SPECIAL FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
OFFICE AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS. The sum of $295,000 included in the other
funds line item in section 1 of this Act and identified as one-time funding in section 2 of this Act is from
the strategic investment and improvements fund for information technology projects.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 54-11-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1005 - PAGE 2
54-11-13. Salary of state treasurer.
The annual salary of the state treasurer is one hundred thirty thousandone hundred thirty-nine
thousand two hundred fifty - six dollars through June 30, 20242026, and one hundred thirty-five thousand
two hundredone hundred forty-three thousand four hundred thirty-four dollars thereafter.
SECTION 6. EMERGENCY. The sum of $295,000 in the total special funds line item in section 1 of
this Act and identified as one-time funding in section 2 of this Act for information technology projects is
declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1005 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1005 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 4 Absent 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 6 Absent 0
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State